apertium-tel.tel.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Telugu

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
Noun
Number
Punctuation


PATTERN Noun
NounRoot(1) [<n>:] NounRoot(2): NounNumber NounCase

LEXICON NounNumber
<sg>:
<pl>:>లు

LEXICON NounCase
<nom>:

###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON NounRoot(2)

కుక్క:కుక్క       <nt>      # "dog"
ఆవు:ఆవు        <nt>      # "cow"
పేరు:పేర{u}      <nt>      # "name"
చెట్టు:చెటటు{u}   <nt>       # "tree" ceTøTu
పెట్టె:పెట్టె         <nt>       # "box" peTøTe
కొడుకు:కొడుకు     <m>       # "son"


PATTERN Number
Numeral+ [<num>:]

LEXICON Numeral
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9


LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:?
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/


# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
